Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
340A

SOLID
WASTE

Section

340A-1 Definitions

340A-2 Ownership of solid waste

340A-3 Disposal of solid waste

Note

L 2014, c 218, §8 purports to amend this chapter.

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Hazardous waste, see chapter 342J.

Integrated solid waste management, see chapter 342G.

Solid waste pollution, see chapter 342H.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next